Massachusetts, session 194th, S1995.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2A of chapter 65C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (f), and inserting in place thereof
the following:-
"(f) For the estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 2025, a credit shall be
allowed against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) equal to the amount of such tax;
provided, however, that the credit shall not exceed the federal level established in 26 USC §
2010 promulgated by the Internal Revenue Service."
SECTION 2. Said section 2A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out
subsection (g), and inserting in place thereof the following:-
"(g) The estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 2025 shall not be required to
pay any tax under subsections (a) and (b) if the value of the federal taxable estate is not more
of 2

than the federal threshold level established in 26 USC Chapter 11 promulgated by the Internal
Revenue Service."
of 2